District of Columbia statutes.
16-1005

Hearing; evidence; protection order.

(a)

Individuals served with notice in accordance with § 16-1004 shall appear at the hearing.

(a-1)

(1)

In a case where the Attorney General files the petition on behalf of a petitioner pursuant to § 16-1003(c), the petitioner is not a required party.

(2)

In a case where a parent, guardian, custodian, or other appropriate adult files a petition on behalf of a minor petitioner under the age of 12, the minor petitioner is not a required party.

(3)

In a hearing under this section, if a parent, guardian, custodian, or other appropriate adult has petitioned for civil protection on behalf of a minor petitioner 12 years of age or older, the court shall consider the expressed wishes of the minor petitioner in deciding whether to issue an order pursuant to this section and in determining the contents of such an order.

(4)

If a respondent is a minor, or if the petitioner is a minor and at least 12 years of age, and if the minor is not accompanied by a parent, guardian, custodian, other appropriate adult, or represented by an attorney, the court may appoint an attorney to represent the minor if such an appointment would not unduly delay the issuance or denial of a protection order. The court may promulgate rules for the appointment of attorneys.

(b)

Notwithstanding section 14-306, in a hearing under this section, one spouse shall be a competent and compellable witness against the other and may testify as to confidential communications, but testimony compelled over a claim of a privilege conferred by such section shall be inadmissible in evidence in a criminal trial over the objection of a spouse entitled to claim that privilege.

(c)

If, after hearing, the judicial officer finds that there is good cause to believe the respondent has committed or threatened to commit a criminal offense against the petitioner or against petitioner’s animal or an animal in petitioner’s household, the judicial officer may issue a protection order that:

(1)

Directs the respondent to refrain from committing or threatening to commit criminal offenses against the petitioner and other protected persons;

(2)

Requires the respondent to stay away from or have no contact with the petitioner and any other protected persons or locations;

(3)

Requires the respondent to participate in psychiatric or medical treatment or appropriate counseling programs;

(4)

Directs the respondent to refrain from entering, or to vacate, the dwelling unit of the petitioner when the dwelling is:

(A)

Marital property of the parties;

(B)

Jointly owned, leased, or rented and occupied by both parties; provided, that joint occupancy shall not be required if the respondent’s actions caused the petitioner to relinquish occupancy;

(C)

Owned, leased, or rented by the petitioner individually; or

(D)

Jointly owned, leased, or rented by the petitioner and a person other than the respondent;

(5)

Directs the respondent to relinquish possession or use of certain personal property owned jointly by the parties or by the petitioner individually;

(6)

Awards temporary custody of a minor child or children of the parties;

(7)

Provides for visitation rights with appropriate restrictions to protect the safety of the petitioner;

(8)

Awards costs and attorney fees;

(9)

Orders the Metropolitan Police Department to take such action as the judicial officer deems necessary to enforce its orders;

(10)

Directs the respondent to relinquish possession of any firearms;

(10A)

Directs the care, custody, or control of a domestic animal that belongs to petitioner or respondent or lives in his or her household;

(11)

Directs the respondent to perform or refrain from other actions as may be appropriate to the effective resolution of the matter; or

(12)

Combines 2 or more of the preceding provisions.

(c-1)

For the purposes of subsection (c)(6) and (7) of this section, if the judicial officer finds by a preponderance of evidence that a contestant for custody has committed an intrafamily offense, any determination that custody or visitation is to be granted to the abusive parent shall be supported by a written statement by the judicial officer specifying factors and findings which support that determination. In determining visitation arrangements, if the judicial officer finds that an intrafamily offense has occurred, the judicial officer shall only award visitation if the judicial officer finds that the child and custodial parent can be adequately protected from harm inflicted by the other party. The party found to have committed an intrafamily offense has the burden of proving that visitation will not endanger the child or significantly impair the child’s emotional development.

(d)

A protection order issued pursuant to this section shall be effective for such period up to one year as the judicial officer may specify, but the judicial officer may, upon motion of any party to the original proceeding, extend, rescind, or modify the order for good cause shown.

(e)

Any final order issued pursuant to this section and any order granting or denying extension, modification, or rescission of such order shall be appealable.

(f)

Violation of any temporary or final order issued under this subchapter, or violation in the District of Columbia of any valid foreign protection order, as that term is defined in subchapter IV of this chapter, or respondent’s failure to appear as required by subsection (a) of this section, shall be punishable as contempt. Upon conviction, criminal contempt shall be punished by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or imprisonment for not more than 180 days, or both.

(g)

Any person who violates any protection order issued under this subchapter, or any person who violates in the District of Columbia any valid foreign protection order, as that term is defined in subchapter IV of this chapter, shall be chargeable with a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or by imprisonment for not more than 180 days, or both.

(g-1)

Enforcement proceedings under subsections (f) and (g) of this section in which the respondent is a child as defined by § 16-2301(3) shall be governed by subchapter I of Chapter 23 of this title.

(h)

For purposes of establishing a violation under subsections (f) and (g) of this section, an oral or written statement made by a person located outside the District of Columbia to a person located in the District of Columbia by means of telecommunication, mail, or any other method of communication shall be deemed to be made in the District of Columbia.

(i)

Orders entered with the consent of the respondent but without an admission that the conduct occurred shall be punishable under subsection (f), (g), or (g-1) of this section.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 547, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 131(a)
Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-144, § 6, 29 DCR 3131
Aug. 25, 1994, D.C. Law 10-154,§ 2(c), 41 DCR 4870
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-237, § 2(b), 42 DCR 36
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(k), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-296, § 2(b), 50 DCR 320
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, §§ 10(a), 54(b), 51 DCR 881
Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 107(b), 55 DCR 9186
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-368, § 3(b)(3), 56 DCR 1338
June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377, § 5, 58 DCR 1174
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 281(a), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Metropolitan police, execution of orders under this section, see § 5-127.04.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1402.21, § 5-127.04, § 7-2502.03, § 16-1003, § 16-1004, § 16-1042, § 42-3505.07, and § 42-3505.08.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1005.
1973 Ed., § 16-1005.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-296 rewrote subsecs. (f) and (g); and added subsecs. (h) and (i).
D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (h), substituted “subsections (f) and (g)” for “subsection (g)”; and, in subsec. (i), substituted “subsection (f) or (g) of this section” for “§ 16-1005(f) or (g)”.
D.C. Law 17-281, in subsec. (c), inserted “, or animal cruelty,” in the lead-in language, deleted “or” from the end of par. (10), and added par. (10A).
D.C. Law 17-368 rewrote subsecs. (a) and (c); added subsecs. (a-1) and (g-1); in subsec. (d), substituted “judicial officer” for “Family Division” in two places; in subsec. (f), substituted “or respondent’s failure to appear as required by subsection (a) of this section” for “and respondent’s failure to appear as required by § 16-1004(b)”; and, in subsec. (i), substituted “(f), (g), or (g-1)” for “(f) or (g)”.
D.C. Law 18-377, in the lead-in language of subsec. (c), substituted “criminal offense against the petitioner or against petitioner’s animal or an animal in petitioner’s household,” for “criminal offense against the petitioner,”; and added subsec. (c)(10A).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not exceeding $1,000” in (f) and (g).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Domestic Violence Protection Orders Technical Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-48, December 9, 2003, law notification 51 DCR 1783).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Technical Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-137, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6861).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Technical Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-220, November 7, 2003, 50 DCR 10049).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-328, January 28, 2004, 51 DCR 1597).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 505 of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 505 of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 281(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.